Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3801
Commission; members; qualifications; appointment; terms.

(1) There is hereby established the Commission on Asian American Affairs. For purposes of sections 81-3801 to 81-3807, commission means the Commission on Asian American Affairs.

(2) The commission shall consist of fourteen members who shall be of Asian ancestry. Members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor. The commission may have such nonvoting, ex officio members as shall be appointed by the commission and who need not be of Asian ancestry. The commission shall elect one of its members as chairperson.

(3) Members of the commission shall serve four-year terms or for the unexpired term in the event of a vacancy. As the terms of the voting members expire, their successors shall be appointed by the Governor from a panel of nominees submitted by the public. An appointment for an unexpired term shall follow the same procedure as for initial and subsequent appointments. Voting members shall be eligible for reappointment.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 28.